Utah statutes.
20A-11-509.   Separate account for contributions for county political party.

(1)  A county political party officer shall deposit a contribution received in one or more separate campaign accounts in a financial institution.

(2)  A county political party officer may not deposit or mingle a contribution received into a personal or business account.



Enacted by Chapter 396, 2011 General Session

